Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 5. Claim Procedure

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Workmen's Compensation §§ 488 to 503.

Presumption or inference that accidental death of employee engaged in occupation of manufacturing or processing arose out of and in course of employment, 47 ALR5th 801.

99 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation § 153 et seq.

§ 27-14-501.
Report by health care provider accepting cases; report of examination; recertification; bills; filing of claims.

Within thirty (30) days after accepting the case of an injured employee and within thirty (30) days after each examination or treatment, a health care provider or a hospital shall file without charge a written medical report with the division. Upon request, the division shall provide a copy of the report to the employer or employee. The division shall notify the employer and the employee that they shall be provided a copy of the report upon request. The report shall state the nature of the injury, the diagnosis, prognosis and prescribed treatment. Any health care provider or hospital failing or refusing to file the report or transmit copies within the time prescribed by this subsection or presenting a claim for services not reasonably justified or which was not required as a result of the work related injury shall forfeit any remuneration or award under this act for services rendered or facilities furnished the employee. Fees or portions of fees for injury related services or products rendered shall not be billed to or collected from the injured employee. Any tests to be administered or other services proposed to be rendered by a health care provider which are clearly not germane to the injury shall be disclosed to the injured employee, if possible, and the employee shall be advised that the cost of the tests or services will be the responsibility of the employee if he consents to the tests or services. Any other necessary and reasonable test or report including initial and necessary follow-up testing for blood borne pathogens, which may be required by division policy or requested by the division, employer or employee may be paid in accordance with a fee schedule adopted by the division. The division shall by rule and regulation institute an appropriate policy for testing for blood borne pathogens after possible occupational exposure and for immediate prophylactic treatment if medically indicated, and shall inform hospitals and primary health care providers of this policy.

Any health care provider attending an employee injured while engaged in any employment covered under this act and certifying temporary total disability under W.S.

27-14-404

shall examine the employee before certification and shall without charge file a written report with the division. Prior to each period of subsequent recertification of temporary total disability, the health care provider shall reexamine the employee and file without charge a written report with the division. In addition, the health care provider shall as soon as practical notify the division upon releasing an injured employee from temporary total disability. Upon request, the division, without delay, shall transmit copies to the employer or employee. The report shall specify reasons for temporary total disability or continued temporary total disability and is subject to the time limitations and penalties imposed under subsection (a) of this section. Any health care provider certifying or recertifying temporary total disability without an examination of the employee shall be reported to the state licensing board for the respective health care provider.

Any bill for medical and hospital care which is not properly dated, itemized and certified by the claimant may be disallowed by the division.

Within thirty (30) days after the first of the month succeeding the month in which services were rendered to the injured employee, itemized bills and claims for medical and hospital care shall be filed with the division. The division shall upon request provide copies to the employee or employer. Any bill or claim not filed by the claimant in accordance with this subsection may result in a denial of the bill or claim.

An initial claim for temporary total disability benefits under W.S.

27-14-404

and any subsequent claim for temporary total disability following the initial period of certification shall be filed with the division and the division shall transmit a copy of the initial claim to the employer. Failure to file a claim for temporary total disability in accordance with W.S.

27-14-404

(d) shall result in denial of the claim.

A claim for permanent impairment or disability benefits under W.S.

27-14-405

and

27-14-406

and a claim for death benefits under W.S.

27-14-403

shall be filed with the division.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 1998, ch. 117, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to employer's report of injury see §

27-14-506

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Hospital and medical care. —

The statute does not provide authority for the workers' compensation division to impose a ninety-day time requirement without qualification for an application to have a personal care item defined as hospital or medical care because it plainly applies to health care providers and not to an employee. Dietz & Assoc's. v. State (ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div.), 12 P.3d 702,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, McCallister v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2019 WY 47, 440 P.3d 1078,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2019).

Commission not authorized to determine compensability of proposed surgery. —

Medical commission lacked subject matter jurisdiction to decide whether employee's proposed back surgery would be compensable where statute presumed that claims for expenses would be made after medical services were rendered, and commission was not authorized to determine compensability of procedure when claim had not been properly submitted and procedure had not been the subject of a final determination by the division of workers' safety and compensation. Daiss v. Division of Workers' Safety & Compensation, Dep't of Empl., 965 P.2d 692,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1998).

Substantiation required. —

Expenses claimed under the death benefits provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-403

(e)(ii) must be documented with receipts or other substantial evidence, and where the spouse had not substantiated a claim for a certain sum, the denial of her claim for an additional benefit of $ 2,500 to cover other unitemized funeral expenses was affirmed. Loberg v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Loberg), 2004 WY 48, 88 P.3d 1045,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2004).

Doctor's form. —

Office of Administrative Hearing (OAH) properly denied claim for temporary total disability (TTD) benefits, where “Return to Work/School” document did not include a certification that the employee was temporarily totally disabled under Wyoming law or set forth the reasons for the disability or expected period of disability as required by the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division Rule and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 27-14-404(d) and 501(b); moreover, the doctor's form did not provide detailed information about the health care provider or the employee's diagnosis, treatment plan, or prognosis.
Bailey v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2010 WY 152, 243 P.3d 953,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited in

Porter v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 69, 396 P.3d 999,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Girardot, 807 P.2d 926,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation: compensability of injuries incurred traveling to or from medical treatment of earlier compensable injury, 83 ALR4th 110.

Social security: Right to disability benefits as affected by refusal to submit to, or cooperate in, medical or surgical treatment, 114 ALR Fed 141.

§ 27-14-502.
Employee's injury report to employer and division; presumption raised by failure to file report; release of information.

As soon as is practical but not later than seventy-two (72) hours after the general nature of the injury became apparent, an injured employee shall, in writing or by other means approved by the department, report the occurrence and general nature of the accident or injury to the employer. In addition, the injured employee shall within ten (10) days after the injury became apparent, file an injury report with the employer and the division in a manner and containing information prescribed by division rule and regulation. If the injured employee is physically unable to comply, a personal representative of the employee, his dependents or a personal representative of the dependents in case of death shall, following notification by the employer or department of reporting requirements, make and file the report for the injured employee.

If an injured employee, any dependent or personal representative makes a written report of the injury to the employer or his representative, the employer shall acknowledge receipt of the report in writing either upon the report or a copy of the report.

Failure of the injured employee, any dependent or personal representative to report the accident or injury to the employer and to file the injury report in accordance with subsection (a) of this section is a presumption that the claim shall be denied. The presumption may be rebutted if the employee establishes by clear and convincing evidence a lack of prejudice to the employer or division in investigating the injury and in monitoring medical treatment.

The filing of an employee’s injury report under this section is a release of information for the duration of the benefit period and upon request and upon notice to the employee, any medical care provider, physician or hospital treating the employee for the injury shall release medical records pertaining to the injury to the division or the employer.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

The term “injury” as used in the compensation statutes means compensable injury. —

Big Horn Coal Co. v. Wartensleben, 502 P.2d 187,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 275

(Wyo. 1972).

Claim and reports constitute pleadings. —

The claim and reports in compensation cases take the place of pleadings and should be liberally construed. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co. v. Harvey, 52 Wyo. 349, 75 P.2d 1,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1938).

Time for giving notice of latent injury. —

Where an employee in the course of his employment sustains an apparent trivial injury which does not result in present disability and which would not reasonably be expected to cause future disability, but which injury in fact after a period of latency does cause future disability, the time for giving notice of the occurrence of the injury to the employer runs from the time when it becomes apparent that such injury has resulted in, or is likely to cause, compensable disability. Big Horn Coal Co. v. Wartensleben, 502 P.2d 187,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 275

(Wyo. 1972).

The fact that the injury notice was given by the employee to the employer 31 hours after attendance at a hospital emergency room, and not within the 24-hour limit, did not preclude an award of benefits, where the employee had worked for two days and then, being unable to continue, had promptly given notice and filed the required reports at the same time he obtained medical attention from an orthopedic physician. W.E. Bill Sauer's Drilling Co. v. Gendron, 720 P.2d 909,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 583

(Wyo. 1986) (limit is now 72 hours).

In order for an employee to have complied with the 20-day (now 10-day) notice provision, she must have filed her notice with the clerk of court within 20 (now 10) days from the time she realized she had a compensable injury. There was substantial evidence to warrant the trial court's finding that the employee, a nurse, first realized she had a compensable injury when a final diagnosis revealed a herniated disk, suffered earlier following the lifting of a patient from his bed. In re Injury to Klevgard, 747 P.2d 509,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 562

(Wyo. 1987).

Where, based on consultation with a physician, claimant had knowledge that her respiratory problems were a condition which could result in, or was likely to cause, a compensable injury, her report of injury filed more than ten days after she gained such knowledge was untimely. Zielinske v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, Zielinske v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1 (In re Zielinske), 959 P.2d 706,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1998).

A hearing examiner's finding that the claimant did not timely file an injury report with the employer or the workers' safety and compensation division was clearly contrary to the weight of the evidence where the claimant thought that his injury was caused by exposure to a chemical paint stripper, but he was given a nonwork-related diagnosis by several physicians, and the claimant nevertheless diligently pursued medical treatment, and he filed an injury report before he finally received a diagnosis that confirmed his suspicions. Rice v. State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2001 WY 21, 19 P.3d 508,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2001).

Hearing examiner erred in determining the date of compensableinjury. —

Hearing examiner erred in determining the date of compensable injury and concluding that a workers' compensation claim was untimely filed; the weight of the evidence showed that the employee injured himself but did not know the nature of and the full extent of his back injury until after a second incident, when he notified his employer of injury, discontinued working, and sought medical treatment. Iverson v. Frost Constr. (In re Iverson), 2003 WY 162, 81 P.3d 190,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2003).

Effect of untimely report on jurisdiction. —

Timely reporting of an injury is not a prerequisite to subject matter jurisdiction. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Summers (In re Summers), 987 P.2d 153,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1999).

Presumption of prejudice. —

Claimant failed to overcome the presumption that her claim should be denied based on the prejudice caused to the employer by her delay in reporting that she had been diagnosed with asthma and could not work with cleaning chemicals. Zielinske v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1 (In re Zielinske), 959 P.2d 706,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1998).

Where both division and employer elected to participate in contested case, injured employee was required to show that neither employer nor division were prejudiced by late filing of injury report. Beitel v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Beitel), 991 P.2d 1242,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1999).

Where six months elapsed between employee's injury and her filing an injury report, employee failed to meet her burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence a lack of prejudice to employer or division in investigating injury and monitoring medical treatment, and employee therefore failed to rebut presumption that her claim should be denied. Nissen v. Cheyenne Frontier Days, Inc., 983 P.2d 722,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1999).

The plain language of subsection (c) indicates that the statutory presumption does not arise unless an employee both failed to report within 72 hours and failed to file an injury report within ten days. Wesaw v. Quality Maintenance, 2001 WY 17, 19 P.3d 500,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2001).

A presumption of claim denial did not arise where the claimant sufficiently complied with the requirement to report to his employer within 72 hours, even if he failed to file an injury report within 10 days. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Jensen, 2001 WY 51, 24 P.3d 1133,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2001).

No presumption of denial arose from the fact the claimant did not file a report within 10 days and there was no prejudice where: (1) the claimant did not seek continuing medical treatment until after she filed for worker's compensation benefits, (2) she saw a physician only one time prior to filing for benefits, (3) surgery was the only treatment recommended by her physician, and (4) there was no evidence to suggest surgery would have been avoided through conservative treatment during the time period between her recognition of her injury and her injury report. State ex rel. State Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Garl, 2001 WY 59, 26 P.3d 1029,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2001).

Claimant failed to rebut statutory presumption. —

Claimant failed to notify his employer within seventy-two hours after the general nature of his injury became apparent, and he also failed to rebut the statutory presumption that his claim should be denied by showing a lack of prejudice to his employer or the division in investigating the injury and monitoring medical treatment. Sherwin-Williams Co. v. Borchert, 994 P.2d 959,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. Feb. 8, 2000).

Where claimant injured her neck and reported the injury to her employer, and two weeks latter injured her back but did not report it, and learned six months later at her annual checkup that she had degenerative disks in her neck and back and reported her condition the next day to her employer, the hearing examiner properly awarded her benefits for her neck injury but not for her back injury; the claimant failed to produce evidence to rebut the presumption arising under § 27-14-502(c) that the worker's compensation division and the employer were prejudiced by her failure to timely report her second injury. Logue v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 62, 44 P.3d 90,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2002).

When injury becomes apparent is a question of fact. —

An employee's duty to report a work-related injury commences when general nature of his injury becomes apparent, which is a question of fact. Beitel v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Beitel), 991 P.2d 1242,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1999).

Plaintiff's injury was readily apparent at time it occurred.—

Employee was aware that he was injured while changing grader blades and related that information to his doctors, and thus his injury became apparent for statute of limitations purposes when it occurred, as opposed to when he was later told he had a herniated disc. Beitel v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Beitel), 991 P.2d 1242,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 180

(Wyo. 1999).

Diagnosis of injury by doctor. —

The evidence indicated that the correct date of compensable injury was October 22, rather than October 15, where the claimant believed that he had not sustained an injury on October 15 and that his symptoms were caused by asthma, and he did not understand the nature and seriousness of his injury until he received a doctor's diagnosis on October 22. Wesaw v. Quality Maintenance, 2001 WY 17, 19 P.3d 500,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2001).

Testimony of driver's accident reconstruction expert was not violative of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-9-209

where the expert used law enforcement reports as a foundation for his expert opinion. The expert mentioned the reports as foundational documents but did not testify as to the specific contents of the documents; his opinion went exclusively to the reconstruction of the accident and he did not testify as to negligence. McGuire v. Solis, 2005 WY 129, 120 P.3d 1020,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2005).

Denial of workers' compensation claim was reversed because under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-502(a), as a matter of law, the general nature of the employee's injury became apparent when the employee learned on the date of diagnosis that she likely had a torn rotator cuff. Blommel v. State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Empl., 2005 WY 128, 120 P.3d 1013,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(2005).

Court may rely upon employee's testimony to establish time injury occurred

and the employee's testimony as to when she reported the injury to her employer. In re Injury to Klevgard, 747 P.2d 509,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 562

(Wyo. 1987).

Time is question of law. —

The question of the time when the employee first knows that he has suffered an injury which results in, or is likely to cause, compensable disability is of course one for the trial judge. Big Horn Coal Co. v. Wartensleben, 502 P.2d 187,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 275

(Wyo. 1972).

Employee was required to report injury to employer and filereport with court clerk. —

Legislature used conjunctive term “and” in subsections (a) and (c) of this section, and therefore employee was required to both report her injury to her employer and to file report with clerk of court within statutory time periods; where employee did not file her report with clerk of court within ten days after her injury became apparent, her claim was correctly denied for failure to rebut the presumption of denial arising from her tardiness. Clark v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 436,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1998).

“Filing” of injury report not satisfied by telephoning. —

Telephonic communications between the parties and the clerk of the court do not satisfy the statutory requirement for “filing.” Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 660 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1983).

General finding of timely notice. —

General finding that timely notice of the injury was made by the employee to his employer is a finding of all essential facts necessary to support it. In re Brothers, 510 P.2d 19,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1973).

Failure to file in timely manner. —

Summary judgment was appropriate where the evidence showed the claimant knew he had suffered a compensable injury, at least by the date of the surgery and in fact when he decided, upon consultation with his physician, to have the surgery but failed to file a report of injury until five months later. Neal v. Caballo Rojo, Inc., 899 P.2d 56,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1995).

Employee's report of injury was not timely where it was not made until after she had surgery for her condition, and she failed to establish lack of resulting prejudice to her employer in investigating accident or monitoring medical treatment. Hampton v. Lifecare Ctr. ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Workers' Compensation Claim of Hampton), 3 P.3d 837,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2000).

Employer who first raised the issue of the timeliness of the worker's claim on appeal waived the issue. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Summers (In re Summers), 987 P.2d 153,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1999).

Failure to file in a timely manner and failure to rebut presumptionof prejudice. —

Denial of workers' compensation benefits was affirmed because the claimant's injury reports to her employer and to the workers' compensation division were not timely filed and she made no attempt to rebut the presumption of prejudice that arose. Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 7, 105 P.3d 101,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2005).

Filing where injury occurs over time. —

Even in the case of an injury which occurs over a period of time, the reporting requirements of §

27-14-502

are as important as the filing requirements of §

27-14-503

, perhaps more so. Neal v. Caballo Rojo, Inc., 899 P.2d 56,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1995).

Burden of proof not met. —

Employee claiming workers'
compensation benefits for an ankle injury failed to prove that the injury was work-related where employee did not mention the injury to his supervisor and did not appear to be limping, employee went to the emergency room the next day after participating in other activities after work and the next morning, and where employee failed to report the injury to his employer within 72 hours or to the division within 10 days pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-502(a).
Bush v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2008 WY 117, 193 P.3d 260,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2008).

Evidence sufficient to show employer prejudiced by late filing.—

Where employee filed report of injury after statutory deadline and the employer had an affirmative policy of monitoring the health care of its employees and assisting in whatever ways were possible to permit an adjustment to the working conditions, this information in the record provided substantial evidence before the hearing examiner of prejudice to the employer and to the division, through the employer, in monitoring the employee's medical treatment. Curnow v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 899 P.2d 875,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1995).

Employer not prejudiced by untimely injury report. —

Where claimant was referred for surgery, which was ultimately performed, because there was neither treatment in the interim nor any evidence that alternative treatment would have prevented surgery, the claimant's employer could not be prejudiced by the untimely injury report. Payne v. Frontier Refining, Inc., 993 P.2d 313,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1999).

Factual finding implicit in stated findings. —

Although the hearing examiner did not make an express finding that the general nature of the employee's injury became apparent to him when his doctor gave him the diagnosis of the herniated disk, that factual finding was so implicit in the hearing examiner's stated findings as to be tantamount to an express finding. Little Am. Ref. Co. v. Witt, 854 P.2d 51,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1993).

February 1996 version of section applied to claim. —

Employee's claim for workers' compensation benefits was governed by law in effect in February 1996, when her injury occurred, and therefore version of this section in effect prior to 1996 amendment applied to her claim. Clark v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 436,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1998).

The concept of a compensable injury

should be the same for purposes of both statutes (former 27-12-502 and former 27-12-503). City of Casper v. Haines, 886 P.2d 585,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1994) (decided under former §§ 27-12-502 and 27-12-503).

Allergic reactions to substances in work environment. —

A claimant was diagnosed as suffering from allergic reactions to substances in his work environment and was treated with salves and lotions through 1984, when a doctor suggested to him that he change work to alleviate some of his symptoms. In 1986, he again sought medical advice, and was ordered to quit working. The district court properly found that the first specific medical enjoinder that the claimant received ordering him to end his job occurred in 1986, and his claim was timely under subsection (a), was not barred under §

27-14-407

, and was not the result of the claimant's own negligence. In re Meredith, 743 P.2d 874,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 515

(Wyo. 1987).

Equitable estoppel. —

Where employer mistakenly told injured employee that she was not entitled to workers' compensation coverage, equitable estoppel applied to prevent workers' compensation division from relying on both one-year statute of limitations and ten-day accident reporting requirement. State ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Barker, 978 P.2d 1156,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1999).

Applied

in

Borelson v. Holiday Inn, 911 P.2d 426,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Dougherty v. J.W. Williams, Inc., 820 P.2d 553,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1991); Sheth v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Comp. Div., 11 P.3d 375,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 2000); Robbins v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2003 WY 29, 64 P.3d 729,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2003); Popick v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2005 WY 110, 118 P.3d 993,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(2005); Rogers v. Russell Constr. Co., 2016 WY 80, 376 P.3d 1172,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Provision of workmen's compensation insurance policy with respect to notice of accident, claim, etc., 18 ALR2d 443.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law §§ 126.01D, 126.04D (Matthew Bender).